Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB278.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The definition of "personnel expense" in section 13A03 of Title 65 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended to read:§ 13A03. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:* * *"Personnel expense." An expenditure for salaries or other forms of compensation, benefits, vehicle allowances, bonuses and reimbursable expenses paid to lobbyists, lobbying staff, research and monitoring staff, consultants, publications and 12345678910111213141516171819 public relations staff, technical staff, clerical and administrative support staff and includes individuals who engage in lobbying but are exempt from reporting under section 13A06 (relating to exemption from [registration and] reporting). For an individual for whom lobbying is incidental to regular employment, the term means a good faith prorated estimate based on the value of the time devoted to lobbying.* * *Section 2. Section 13A04(a) of Title 65 is amended and subsection (e) is amended by adding a paragraph to read:§ 13A04. Registration.(a) General rule.--[Unless excluded under section 13A06 (relating to exemption from registration and reporting), a lobbyist, lobbying firm or a principal must register with the department electronically using the computerized filing system developed by the department that is consistent with the purposes of this chapter within ten days of acting in any capacity as a lobbyist, lobbying firm or principal.] Registration shall be biennial and shall begin January 1, 2007. Unless excluded under section 13A06 (relating to exemption from reporting), the following shall apply:(1) A lobbyist, lobbying firm or a principal that is registered at the end of a biennial term shall be automatically registered for the next biennial term, unless a notice of termination under subsection (e) is filed with the department by January 10 of the next biennial term.(2) A lobbyist, lobbying firm or a principal that is not registered at the end of a biennial term or which has filed a notice of termination under paragraph (1) or previously, must register within 10 days of acting in any capacity as a 20250HB0278PN0170 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 lobbyist, lobbying firm or a principal.* * *(e) Termination.--* * *(5) A lobbyist, lobbying firm or principal may file a notice of termination at the conclusion of the relationship between a principal and a lobbyist or lobbying firm.Section 3. Section 13A05(b)(8) and (d) of Title 65 are amended and the section is amended by adding a subsection to read:§ 13A05. Reporting.* * *(b) Content.--* * *(8) A lobbying firm or a lobbyist not associated with a lobbying firm shall submit a report electronically using the computerized filing system developed by the department that is consistent with the purpose of this chapter if the lobbying firm or lobbyist engaged in lobbying on behalf of any entity that is exempt under section 13A06(7), (8), (9) or (10) (relating to exemption from [registration and] reporting).* * *(d) Thresholds for reporting.--An expense report required under this section shall be filed electronically using the computerized filing system developed by the department that is consistent with the purpose of this chapter when total expenses for lobbying exceed [$2,500] $1 for a registered principal in a reporting period. [In a reporting period in which total expenses are $2,500 or less, a statement to that effect shall be filed 20250HB0278PN0170 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 electronically using the computerized filing system developed by the department that is consistent with the purpose of this chapter.](d.1) Additional reporting thresholds.--An expense report required under this section shall be filed electronically using the computerized filing system developed by the department that is consistent with the purpose of this chapter when the economic consideration for campaign consulting exceeds $2,500 for a registered campaign consultant.* * *Section 4. Sections 13A06 and 13A08(f) and (j) of Title 65 are amended to read:§ 13A06. Exemption from [registration and] reporting.The following persons and activities shall be exempt from [registration under section 13A04 (relating to registration) and] reporting under section 13A05 (relating to reporting):(1) An individual who limits lobbying to preparing testimony and testifying before a committee of the General Assembly or participating in an administrative proceeding of an agency.(2) An individual who is an employee of an entity engaged in the business of publishing or broadcasting while engaged in the gathering and dissemination of news and comment on the news to the general public in the ordinary course of business.(3) An individual who does not receive economic consideration for lobbying.[(4) An individual whose economic consideration for lobbying, from all principals represented, does not exceed $2,500 in the aggregate during any reporting period.20250HB0278PN0170 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (5) An individual who engages in lobbying on behalf of the individual's employer if the lobbying represents less than 20 hours during any reporting period.(6) Except as required under section 13A05(d), a principal whose total expenses for lobbying purposes do not exceed $2,500 during any reporting period.](4.1) An individual whose economic consideration for campaign consulting does not exceed $2,500 in the aggregate during any reporting period.(7) An elected State official who acts in an official capacity.(8) An appointed State official acting in an official capacity.(9) An elected or appointed official of a political subdivision who is acting in an official capacity for the political subdivision.(10) An employee of the Commonwealth or an agency of the Commonwealth who is acting in an official capacity for the Commonwealth or agency.(11) An individual representing a bona fide church or bona fide religious body of which the individual is a member where the lobbying is solely for the purpose of protecting the constitutional right to the free exercise of religion.(12) An individual who is not a registered lobbyist and who serves on an advisory board, working group or task force at the request of an agency or the General Assembly.(13) Participating as a party or as an attorney at law or representative of a party, case or controversy in any administrative adjudication pursuant to 2 Pa.C.S. (relating to administrative law and procedure).20250HB0278PN0170 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (14) Expenditures and other transactions subject to reporting under Article XVI of the act of June 3, 1937 (P.L.1333, No.320), known as the Pennsylvania Election Code.(15) Vendor activities under 62 Pa.C.S. §§ 514 (relating to small procurements), 516 (relating to emergency procurements) and efforts directly related to responding to publicly advertised invitations to bid and requests for proposals.§ 13A08. Administration.* * *(f) Audits.--The following shall apply:(1) Every two years the Secretary of the Commonwealth shall contract for the services of one or more certified public accountants or certified public accounting firms. The contract shall be awarded in a manner consistent with the provisions of 62 Pa.C.S. Pt. I (relating to Commonwealth Procurement Code), and no certified public accountant or certified public accounting firm shall be eligible to obtain a contract for more than two successive contract periods.(2) The secretary shall randomly select, at a public drawing 60 days following the close of each fourth quarter reporting period, 3% of all completed registrations and expense reports filed with the department under this chapter.(3) The certified public accountant shall conduct [the] financial and performance audits in accordance with generally accepted auditing standards and shall test as to whether each registration or expense report is materially correct.[(4) The audit report and findings shall be confidential, except that the department shall make an audit report and findings available to the commission if the 20250HB0278PN0170 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 commission is investigating an alleged violation of this chapter involving the audited registration or expense report. The commission shall include the relevant portion of an audit as part of its findings of fact in a commission order which results from an investigation arising out of an audit.](4.1) The audit reports and findings shall be made public. The commission shall determine whether a report of adverse findings warrants enforcement or remedial action under the provisions of this chapter.(5) Nothing in this subsection shall limit the authority of the Department of Revenue under Article IV of the act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971, to conduct audits to determine compliance with applicable tax laws.* * *(j) Inflation adjustment.--On a biennial basis commencing in January 2009, the department shall review the threshold under section 13A06 (relating to exemption from [registration and] reporting) for registration under section 13A04 (relating to registration) and the threshold for reporting under section 13A05(d) (relating to reporting) and shall increase these amounts to rates deemed reasonable for assuring appropriate disclosure. On a biennial basis commencing in January 2009, the department shall review the filing fee established under section 13A10 (relating to registration fees; fund established; system; regulations) and may by regulation adjust this amount if the department determines that a higher fee is needed to cover the costs of carrying out the provisions of this chapter. The department shall publish adjusted amounts in the Pennsylvania Bulletin by June 1, 2009, and by June 1 every two years 20250HB0278PN0170 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 thereafter as necessary.* * *Section 5. This act shall take effect in 180 days.20250HB0278PN0170 - 8 - 123